Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-180
State bank; reorganization as national bank; vote required.

Any state bank, without the approval of any state authority, may, upon a vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of its capital stock, convert into and merge or consolidate with a national bank as provided by federal law.

Laws 1951, c. 11, § 1(3), p. 85;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-165.02;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 80, p. 165;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 76.